New Jersey, session 221, A1809.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  If a newborn screening for hereditary disorders performed pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1981, c.502 (C.26:5B-4), P.L.1977, c.321 (C.26:2-110 et seq.), or any other applicable law or regulation detects the presence of sickle cell trait, the laboratory performing the screening shall notify the physician responsible for the newborns care and shall document the patients information in the central registry established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.     , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) in a manner and on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Health. b.    The physician responsible for the newborns care shall provide the patients parents with information concerning the availability and benefits of genetic counseling performed by a genetic counselor licensed pursuant to P.L.2009, c.41 (C.45:9-37.111 et seq.).  Genetic counseling concerning a diagnosis of sickle cell trait shall include, but not be limited to, information concerning the fact that one or both of the parents carries sickle cell trait and the risk that other children born to the parents may carry sickle cell trait or may be born with sickle cell disease. 2.    a.  The Commissioner of Health shall establish a central registry of patients diagnosed with sickle cell trait.  The information in the central registry shall be used for the purposes of compiling statistical information and assisting the provision of follow-up counseling, intervention, and educational services to patients and to the parents of patients who are listed in the registry including, but not limited to, information concerning the availability and benefits of genetic counseling performed by a genetic counselor licensed pursuant to P.L.2009, c.41 (C.45:9-37.111 et seq.). b.    The commissioner shall establish a system to notify the parents of patients who are listed in the registry that follow-up consultations with a physician are recommended for children diagnosed with sickle cell trait.  Such notifications shall be provided: at least once when the patient is in early adolescence, when the patient may begin to participate in strenuous athletic activities that could result in adverse symptoms for a person with sickle cell trait; at least once during later adolescence, when the patient should be made aware of the reproductive implications of sickle cell trait; and at such other intervals as the commissioner may require. c.     The commissioner shall establish a system under which the Department of Health shall make reasonable efforts to notify patients listed in the registry who reach the age of 18 years of the patients inclusion in the registry and of the availability of educational services, genetic counseling, and other resources that may be beneficial to the patient. d.    Information on newborn infants and their families compiled pursuant to this section may be used by the department and agencies designated by the commissioner for the purposes of carrying out this act, but otherwise the information shall be confidential and not divulged or made public so as to disclose the identity of any person to whom it relates, except as provided by law.  A person who discloses information in violation of this section is guilty of a disorderly persons offense.  Each disclosure made in violation of this section is a separate and actionable offense. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.